District of Columbia statutes.
9-324

Calvert Street Bridge.

Any street railway company using the bridge constructed to replace the Calvert Street Bridge over Rock Creek, as authorized by the Act of June 16, 1933 (48 Stat. 229, ch. 93) shall install thereon, at its own expense, an approved underground system of streetcar propulsion and, at its own expense, shall thereafter maintain such underground construction, and bear the cost of surfacing and resurfacing and maintaining in good condition the space between the railway tracks and 2 feet exterior thereto as provided by law, and shall defray the cost of excess construction occasioned by such use including the relocation and construction of closed plow pits at the west approach to the bridge in accordance with plans to be approved by the Mayor of the District of Columbia.

June 16, 1933, 48 Stat. 229, ch. 93
1981 Ed., § 7-524.
1973 Ed., § 7-524.
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.